West Virginia, session 2026, HB5201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. TRAFFIC SIGNS, SIGNALS AND MARKINGS. §17C-3-1. Adoption of manual and specifications for uniform system of traffic-control devices. The state road commission shall adopt a manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic-control devices consistent with the provisions of this chapter for use upon highways within this state. Such uniform system shall correlate with and so far as possible conform to the system then current as approved by the American association of state highway officials: Provided, That the Division of Highways shall provide public notification to local media and social media of all construction traffic changes 48 hours in advance. Public notification shall not include emergency changes.